New York, session 2025-2026, A5995.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 286 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 286. Prohibition on book banning. No library, or library system 4 established or operating under this article, including school libraries 5 and school library systems, shall proscribe, ban, or remove any books or 6 other materials because of partisan or doctrinal disapproval. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06099-01-5